Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0647.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 51f. (1) In addition to the distributions under sections 51, and 51d, and 51e, from the revenue collected from the tax levied under section 51 an amount equal to that portion of the withholding tax capture revenues attributable to certified new jobs and the amount due to be paid to an authorized business pursuant to a written agreement entered into under chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270 , MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j, shall must be deposited each state fiscal year into the good jobs for Michigan fund created in section 90j of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090j.in a restricted account for the purpose of satisfying remaining contractual obligations under the written agreement. (2) As used in this section, "authorized business" , "certified new jobs", "withholding tax capture revenues", and "written agreement" mean those terms as defined in section 90g of the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270. , MCL 125.2090g. Sec. 266a. (1) Subject to the limitations under this section, a qualified taxpayer with a certificate of completed rehabilitation issued pursuant to under subsection (4) after December 31, 2020 and before January 1, 2031 may credit against the tax imposed by this part the amount determined pursuant to subsection (2) for the qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of a historic resource pursuant to the rehabilitation plan in the year in which the certificate of completed rehabilitation of the historic resource is issued. The qualified taxpayer shall initially claim a credit under this section within 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued pursuant to under subsection (4). If the credit is not initially claimed within 5 years after the certificate is issued, the certificate is no longer valid and the qualified taxpayer is no longer eligible to claim a credit under this section for that rehabilitation plan. Only those expenditures that are paid or incurred during the time periods prescribed for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code and any related treasury regulations shall be are considered qualified expenditures. (2) Subject to the limitations under this section, a qualified taxpayer that has claimed and received a credit for qualified expenditures under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or has entered into an agreement under subsection (10) may claim a credit under this section equal to 25% of the qualified expenditures that are eligible, or would have been eligible except that the qualified taxpayer entered into an agreement under subsection (10), for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or, if the qualified taxpayer is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, 25% of the qualified expenditures that would qualify under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code except that the expenditures are made to a historic resource that is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code. (3) To be eligible for the credit under this section, a person shall submit an application and a rehabilitation plan to the state historic preservation office. Completed applications must be considered in the order in which the office received the completed applications and approved or denied within 120 days of after receipt of the completed applications. If the office determines that the application is complete and the rehabilitation plan meets the criteria for a credit under this section, the office shall issue a preapproval letter to the applicant that states that the rehabilitation plan qualifies for the credit under this section and the maximum total amount of the credit reserved for which a credit may be claimed when the project is complete and a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued for qualified expenditures pursuant to that rehabilitation plan. If an application is denied under this subsection, the applicant may file an appeal in a form and manner as prescribed by the office or subsequently reapply for the same rehabilitation plan or for another rehabilitation plan, or both. Subject to the limitations under this section, the total of all credits reserved under preapproval letters for rehabilitation plans approved under this section and section 676 shall must not exceed $5,000,000.00 per calendar year. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of small nonresidential historic resources for credits in excess of $2,000,000.00, not less than $2,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall must be approved for small nonresidential historic resources. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of large nonresidential historic resources for credits in excess of $2,000,000.00, not less than $2,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall must be approved for large nonresidential historic resources. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of residential historic resources for credits in excess of $1,000,000.00, not less than $1,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall must be approved for residential historic resources. The office shall not issue a preapproval letter or certificate of completed rehabilitation that authorizes a qualified taxpayer to claim a credit of more than $2,000,000.00 in a single tax year for the same historic resource. If, for any calendar year, the office issues preapproval letters and reserves the maximum amount of tax credits allowed under this section for that calendar year, the office shall notify all applicants who have submitted completed applications and rehabilitation plans then awaiting approval or submitted for approval after the calculation is made that no additional preapproval letters for rehabilitation plans will be issued during that calendar year. The office shall also notify those applicants of the priority number given to the applicant's application and rehabilitation plan awaiting approval. The applications and plans will remain in priority status for 2 years from the date of the original application and plan and will be considered for approval and reservation of tax credits in the priority order established in this subsection in the event that additional credits become available resulting from the rescission of approvals under this subsection or subsection (5) and at the beginning of the next calendar year. An applicant that has received a preapproval letter shall commence rehabilitation, if it has not previously begun, within 1 year after the issuance of the preapproval letter and complete the rehabilitation plan within 8 years after the issuance of the preapproval letter or the office will rescind the preapproval letter and reallocate the amount of the credit reserved for that rehabilitation plan. Upon On completion of a rehabilitation plan for which a preapproval letter was issued, the applicant shall submit to the office documentation that the rehabilitation is complete and the completed rehabilitation of the historic resource meets the criteria under subsection (6) and either of the following: (a) All of the following criteria: (i) The historic resource contributes to the significance of the historic district in which it is located or is individually listed on the National Register of Historic Places or state register of historic sites. (ii) Both the rehabilitation plan and completed rehabilitation of the historic resource meet the federal secretary of the interior's Secretary of the Interior's standards for rehabilitation and guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings, under 36 CFR part 67 and related guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings. (iii) All rehabilitation work has been done to or within the walls, boundaries, or structures of the historic resource or to historic resources located within the property boundaries of the resource. (b) The applicant has received certification from the national park service that the historic resource's significance, the rehabilitation plan, and the completed rehabilitation qualify for the credit allowed under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code. (4) The office shall verify that the rehabilitation is complete and meets the criteria under subsection (3). However, if the applicant is eligible for the credit allowed under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, additional documentation that the rehabilitation is complete for the credit allowed under this section is not required. Within 120 days after receiving verification, in a form and manner as prescribed by the office, that the rehabilitation is complete and meets the requirements of subsection (3), the office shall issue a certificate of completed rehabilitation to the applicant that states the rehabilitation plan submitted by the applicant has been completed, the amount of qualified expenditures, and the total amount of the credit allowed to be claimed by a qualified taxpayer under this section. If the amount of qualified expenditures incurred exceeds the amount of the tax credits reserved by the preapproval letter issued under subsection (3), the applicant may submit a request to the office, in a form and manner as prescribed by the office, for the issuance and approval of a certificate of completed rehabilitation in excess of the amount initially authorized in the preapproval letter. If the office determines that less than $5,000,000.00 has been reserved under preapproval letters issued for the calendar year, after priority has been given to those notified under subsection (3), then the office may issue a certificate of completed rehabilitation in excess of the amount included in the preapproval letter. (5) The office may inspect a historic resource at any time during the rehabilitation process and may revoke the preapproval letter or the certificate of completed rehabilitation if the rehabilitation was not undertaken as represented in the rehabilitation plan or if unapproved alterations to the completed rehabilitation are made within 5 years after the tax year in which the certificate of completed rehabilitation was issued. The office shall promptly notify the department of a revocation. (6) Qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of a historic resource may be used to calculate the credit under this section if the historic resource is 1 of the following during the tax year in which a credit under this section is claimed for those qualified expenditures: (a) Individually listed on the National Register of Historic Places or state register of historic sites. (b) A contributing resource located within a historic district listed on the National Register of Historic Places or the state register of historic sites. (c) A contributing resource located within a historic district designated by a local unit pursuant to an ordinance adopted under the local historic districts act, 1970 PA 169, MCL 399.201 to 399.215. (7) A person that has been issued a certificate of completed rehabilitation under subsection (4) may assign all or any portion of the credit allowed under this section. A credit assignment under this subsection is irrevocable and shall must be made in the tax year in which a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. A qualified taxpayer may claim a portion of a credit and assign the remaining amount. If the qualified taxpayer both claims and assigns portions of the credit, the qualified taxpayer shall claim the portion it claims in the tax year in which a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued pursuant to this section. Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, an assignee may subsequently assign the credit or any portion of the credit assigned under this subsection to 1 or more assignees. An assignment or subsequent reassignment of a credit shall must be made in the year the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. A credit assignment or subsequent reassignment under this section shall must be made on a form prescribed by the office. The office shall review and issue a completed assignment or reassignment certificate to the assignee or reassignee. A credit amount assigned under this subsection may be claimed against the assignee's tax liability under this part or part 2. A credit amount authorized or assigned to a partnership, limited liability company, or subchapter S corporation under this section or section 676 may be claimed against the partner's, member's, or shareholder's tax liability under this part based on the partner's, member's, or shareholder's proportionate share of ownership or an alternative method approved by the office. An assignee or subsequent reassignee shall attach a copy of the completed assignment certificate to the annual return required to be filed under this part for the tax year in which the assignment or reassignment is made and the assignee or reassignee first claims the credit, which shall must be the same tax year. (8) If the credit allowed under this section for the tax year and any unused carryforward of the credit allowed by this section exceed the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year shall must not be refunded but may be carried forward to offset tax liability in subsequent tax years for 10 years or until used up, whichever occurs first. If a qualified taxpayer has an unused carryforward of a credit under this section, the amount otherwise added under subsection (9) to the qualified taxpayer's tax liability may instead be used to reduce the qualified taxpayer's carryforward under this section. (9) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (10), if a certificate of completed rehabilitation is revoked under subsection (5) or if the historic resource is sold or disposed of less than 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, the following percentage of the credit amount previously claimed relative to that historic resource shall must be added back to the tax liability of the qualified taxpayer that received the certificate of completed rehabilitation and not the assignee in the year of the revocation: (a) If the revocation is less than 1 year after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 100%. (b) If the revocation is at least 1 year but less than 2 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 80%. (c) If the revocation is at least 2 years but less than 3 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 60%. (d) If the revocation is at least 3 years but less than 4 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 40%. (e) If the revocation is at least 4 years but less than 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 20%. (f) If the revocation is at least 5 years or more after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, an addback to the qualified taxpayer tax liability is not required. (10) Subsection (9) shall does not apply if the qualified taxpayer enters into a written agreement with the office that will allow for the transfer or sale of the historic resource and provides the following: (a) Reasonable assurance that subsequent to after the transfer the property will remain a historic resource during the 5-year period after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. (b) A method that the department can recover an amount from the qualified taxpayer equal to the appropriate percentage of credit added back as described under subsection (9). (c) An encumbrance on the title to the historic resource being sold or transferred, stating that the property must remain a historic resource throughout the 5-year period after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. (d) A provision for the payment by the qualified taxpayer of all legal and professional fees associated with the drafting, review, and recording of the written agreement required under this subsection. (11) The office may impose a fee to cover the administrative cost of implementing the program under this section. (12) The qualified taxpayer shall attach all of the following to the qualified taxpayer's annual return under this part: (a) Certificate of completed rehabilitation. (b) Certification of historic significance related to the historic resource and the qualified expenditures used to claim a credit under this section. (c) A completed assignment form if the qualified taxpayer is an assignee under this section or section 676 of any portion of a credit allowed under that section. (13) The office may promulgate rules to implement this section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (14) The total of the credits claimed under this section and section 676 for a rehabilitation project shall must not exceed 25% of the total qualified expenditures eligible for the credit under this section for that rehabilitation project. (15) The office shall submit an economic impact report that includes, to the extent available, all of the following to the legislature annually for the immediately preceding state fiscal year: (a) The fee schedule used by the office and the total amount of fees collected. (b) A description of each rehabilitation project for which a preapproval letter was issued and for each certificate of completed rehabilitation issued. The description must include the total rehabilitation costs, labor hours generated, jobs added, payroll added, total capital investments, gain in property value after rehabilitation, and the amount of income tax and sales tax generated by the rehabilitation project. (c) The location of each new and ongoing rehabilitation project. (16) As used in this section: (a) "Contributing resource" means a historic resource that contributes to the significance of the historic district in which it is located. (b) "Detroit Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. (c) "Historic district" means an area, or group of areas not necessarily having contiguous boundaries, that contains 1 resource or a group of resources that are related by history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, or culture. (d) "Historic resource" means a publicly or privately owned historic building, structure, site, object, feature, or open space located within a historic district designated by the National Register of Historic Places, the state register of historic sites, or a local unit acting under the local historic districts act, 1970 PA 169, MCL 399.201 to 399.215, ; or that is individually listed on the state register of historic sites or National Register of Historic Places. (e) "Large nonresidential historic resource" means a nonowner-occupied, income producing historic resource that has a rehabilitation plan with qualified expenditures of $2,000,000.00 or more. (f) "Local unit" means a county, city, village, or township. (g) "Long-term lease" means a lease term of at least 27.5 years for a residential resource or at least 31.5 years for a nonresidential resource. (h) "Open space" means undeveloped land, a naturally landscaped area, or a formal or man-made landscaped area that provides a connective link or a buffer between other resources. (i) "Qualified expenditures" means capital expenditures that qualify, or would qualify except that the qualified taxpayer entered into an agreement under subsection (10), for a rehabilitation credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code if the qualified taxpayer is eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or, if the applicant is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, the qualified expenditures that would qualify under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code except that the expenditures are made to a historic resource that is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, that were paid. Qualified expenditures do not include capital expenditures for nonhistoric additions to a historic resource except an addition that is required by state or federal regulations that relate to historic preservation, safety, or accessibility. (j) "Qualified taxpayer" means a person that is an assignee under this section or section 676 or that either owns the resource to be rehabilitated or has a long-term lease agreement with the owner of the historic resource and that has qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of the historic resource that satisfies either of the following: (i) For the rehabilitation of a residential historic resource, qualified expenditures equal to or greater than $1,000.00. The $1,000.00 amount must be annually adjusted for inflation using the Detroit Consumer Price Index. (ii) For the rehabilitation of a historic resource that is not a residential historic resource, qualified expenditures equal to or greater than 10% of the state equalized valuation of the property. If the historic resource to be rehabilitated is a portion of a historic or nonhistoric resource, the state equalized valuation of only that portion of the property shall must be used for purposes of this subparagraph. If the assessor for the local tax collecting unit in which the historic resource is located determines the state equalized valuation of that portion, that assessor's determination shall must be used for purposes of this subparagraph. If the assessor does not determine that state equalized valuation of that portion, qualified expenditures, for purposes of this subparagraph, shall must be equal to or greater than 5% of the appraised value as determined by a certified appraiser. If the historic resource to be rehabilitated does not have a state equalized valuation, qualified expenditures for purposes of this subparagraph shall must be equal to or greater than 5% of the appraised value of the resource as determined by a certified appraiser. (k) "Rehabilitation plan" means a plan for the rehabilitation of a historic resource that meets the federal Secretary of the Interior's standards for rehabilitation and guidelines for rehabilitation of historic buildings under 36 CFR part 67 and related guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings. (l) "Residential historic resource" means a non-income producing historic resource that is an owner-occupied dwelling. (m) "Small nonresidential historic resource" means a nonowner-occupied, income producing historic resource that has a rehabilitation plan with qualified expenditures of less than $2,000,000.00. (n) "State historic preservation office" or "office" means the state historic preservation office created by Executive Order No. 2007-53 and transferred to the Michigan strategic fund by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-3, MCL 125.1998.bureau of fair competition and free enterprise by section 13 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Sec. 270. (1) For tax years that begin after December 31, 2008, a taxpayer to whom a tax voucher certificate is issued under an agreement entered into before January 1, 2012 or a taxpayer that is the transferee of a tax voucher certificate that is issued under an agreement entered into before January 1, 2012 may use the tax voucher certificate to pay any liability of the taxpayer under section 51 or to pay any amount owed by the taxpayer under section 703 or former section 351. (2) A tax voucher certificate shall must be used for the purposes allowed under subsection (1) and only in a tax year that begins after December 31, 2008. (3) The amount of the tax voucher that may be used to pay a liability due under this part in any tax year shall must not exceed the lesser of the following: (a) The amount of the tax voucher stated in the tax voucher certificate held by the taxpayer. (b) The amount authorized to be used in the tax year under the terms of the tax voucher certificate. (c) The taxpayer's liability under this part for the tax year for which the tax voucher is used. (4) If the amount of any tax voucher certificate held by a taxpayer or transferee exceeds the amount the taxpayer may use under subsection (3)(b) or (c) in a tax year, that excess may be used by the taxpayer or transferee to pay, subject to the limitations of subsection (3), any future liability of the taxpayer or transferee under this part. (5) The tax voucher certificate, and any completed transfer form that was issued pursuant to the Michigan early stage venture investment act of 2003, former 2003 PA 296, MCL 125.2231 to 125.2263, shall must be attached to the annual return under this part. The department may prescribe and implement alternative methods of reporting and recording ownership, transfer, and utilization of tax voucher certificates that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this act. The department shall administer this section to assure ensure that any amount of a tax voucher certificate used to pay any liability under this part shall is not also be applied to pay any liability of the taxpayer or any other person under the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601. 208.1519. The department shall take any action necessary to enforce and effectuate the permissible issuance and use of tax voucher certificates in a manner authorized under this section and the Michigan early stage venture investment act of 2003, former 2003 PA 296. , MCL 125.2231 to 125.2263. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Certificate" or "tax voucher certificate" means the tax voucher certificate issued under section 23 of the Michigan early stage venture capital investment act of 2003, former 2003 PA 296 , MCL 125.2253, or any replacement tax voucher certificate issued under former section 37e(9)(b) 37e(11)(b) or (d) of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , or section 419 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1419. (b) "Transferee" means a taxpayer to whom a tax voucher certificate has been transferred under section 23 of the Michigan early stage venture investment act of 2003, former 2003 PA 296 , MCL 125.2253, and former section 37e of the single business tax act, former 1975 PA 228 , or section 419 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1419. Sec. 278. (1) Subject to the limitations provided under this section, a taxpayer that makes a qualified investment after December 31, 2010 and before January 1, 2012 in a qualified business may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this act equal to 25% of the qualified investment made during the tax year. (2) To qualify for the credit under this section, the taxpayer shall request certification from the Michigan strategic fund within 60 days of making the investment. A taxpayer shall not claim a credit under this section unless the Michigan strategic fund has issued a certificate to the taxpayer. The board shall not approve a credit under this section for a taxpayer who has been convicted of a felony involving a fiduciary obligation or the conversion or misappropriation of funds or insurance accounts, theft, deceit, fraud, misrepresentation, or corruption. The Michigan strategic fund shall forward a copy of each certificate received pursuant to issued under this subsection to the governor, the president of the Michigan strategic fund, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the chairperson of the house tax policy committee, the director of the senate fiscal agency, and the director of the house fiscal agency. The requirements of section 28(1)(f) of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.28, do not apply to the disclosure required by this subsection. The Michigan strategic fund shall not certify more than $1,000,000.00 in qualified investments in any 1 qualified business. The taxpayer shall attach the certificate to the annual return filed under this act on which a credit under this section is claimed. The certificate required under this subsection shall must specify all of the following: (a) The total amount of investment made during the tax year by the taxpayer in each qualified business. (b) The total amount of qualified investments made in each qualified business if different from the previous amount. (c) The total amount of the credit under this section that the taxpayer is allowed to claim for the designated tax year. (3) A taxpayer shall not claim a credit of more than $250,000.00 based on an investment in any 1 qualified business and shall not claim a credit of more than $250,000.00 for qualified investments in all qualified businesses in any 1 year. The credit allowed under this section shall must be taken by the taxpayer in equal installments over 2 years beginning with the tax year in which the certification was issued. (4) The total amount of credits that the Michigan strategic fund may not certify under this section shall not exceed more than $9,000,000.00 of total credits under this section. (5) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year shall must not be refunded but may be carried forward to offset tax liability under this act in subsequent tax years for a period not to exceed 5 tax years or until used up, whichever occurs first. (6) The board shall develop an application and approval process in order to certify investments under this section and adopt a program describing parameters and criteria to be used for approving investments. As part of that program adoption, the board may determine and describe the conditions to be met to be considered an investment alongside or through an approved angel group, seed capital firm, or venture capital firm. (7) A taxpayer who has not paid or entered into an installment agreement regarding a final assessment of an unpaid liability for a state tax for which all rights of appeal have been exhausted or who is currently in a bankruptcy proceeding is not eligible to claim a credit under this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Board" means the board of directors of the Michigan strategic fund. (b) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund as described in the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270. , MCL 125.2001 to 125.2094. (c) "Qualified business" means a business that the board certifies as in compliance with all of the following at the time of the investment: (i) The business is a seed or early stage business as defined in section 3 of the Michigan early stage venture investment act of 2003, former 2003 PA 296. , MCL 125.2233. (ii) The business has its headquarters in this state, is domiciled in this state, and has a majority of its employees working in this state. (iii) The business has a preinvestment valuation of less than $10,000,000.00 and has fewer than 100 full-time equivalent employees. (iv) The business has been in existence for 1 of the following, as applicable: (A) Except as otherwise provided under this subparagraph, the business has been in existence sub-subparagraph (B), less than 5 years. ; or, for (B) For a business in which the business activity is derived from research at an institution of higher education located within this state or an organization exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that is located within this state, the business has been in existence less than 10 years. As used in this subparagraph, sub-subparagraph, "institution of higher education" means a public or private college or university that awards a bachelor's degree or other degrees. is an institution of higher education. (v) The business is not a retail establishment as described in section 44-45 ? retail trade, of the North American industry classification system, Industry Classification System, United States, 1997, published by the office of management and budget. (vi) The business has not claimed a credit under section 431 , 455, 457, or 459 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1431, 208.1455, 208.1457, and 208.1459.or former section 455, 457, or 459 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36. (d) "Qualified investment" means, except as otherwise provided under this subdivision, an investment of at least $20,000.00 certified by the Michigan strategic fund that is made alongside of, or through, a seed venture capital or angel investor group that is registered with the Michigan strategic fund and is not in a business in which any member of the investor's family is an employee or owner of the business or in which the investor or any member of the investor's family has a preexisting fiduciary relationship with the business. Qualified investment does not include an investment in a business that engages in life sciences technology unless those activities are included in the definition of life sciences as that term is defined under section 88a of the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270. , MCL 125.2088a. Sec. 676. (1) Subject to the limitations under this section, a qualified taxpayer with a certificate of completed rehabilitation issued pursuant to under subsection (4) after December 31, 2020 and before January 1, 2031 may credit against the tax imposed by this part the amount determined pursuant to subsection (2) for the qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of a historic resource pursuant to the rehabilitation plan in the year in which the certificate of completed rehabilitation of the historic resource is issued. The qualified taxpayer shall initially claim a credit under this section within 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued pursuant to under subsection (4). If the credit is not initially claimed within 5 years after the certificate is issued, the certificate is no longer valid and the qualified taxpayer is no longer eligible to claim a credit under this section for that rehabilitation plan. Only those expenditures that are paid or incurred during the time periods prescribed for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code and any related treasury regulations shall be are considered qualified expenditures. (2) Subject to the limitations under this section, a qualified taxpayer that has claimed and received a credit for qualified expenditures under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or has entered into an agreement under subsection (10) may claim a credit under this section equal to 25% of the qualified expenditures that are eligible, or would have been eligible except that the qualified taxpayer entered into an agreement under subsection (10), for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or, if the qualified taxpayer is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, 25% of the qualified expenditures that would qualify under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code except that the expenditures are made to a historic resource that is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code. (3) To be eligible for the credit under this section, a person shall submit an application and a rehabilitation plan to the state historic preservation office. Completed applications must be considered in the order in which the office received the completed applications and approved or denied within 120 days of after receipt of the completed applications. If the office determines that the application is complete and the rehabilitation plan meets the criteria for a credit under this section, the office shall issue a preapproval letter to the applicant that states that the rehabilitation plan qualifies for the credit under this section and the maximum total amount of the credit reserved for which a credit may be claimed when the project is complete and a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued for qualified expenditures pursuant to that rehabilitation plan. If an application is denied under this subsection, the applicant may file an appeal in a form and manner as prescribed by the office or subsequently reapply for the same rehabilitation plan or for another rehabilitation plan, or both. Subject to the limitations under this section, the total of all credits reserved under preapproval letters for rehabilitation plans approved under this section and section 266a shall must not exceed $5,000,000.00 per calendar year. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of small nonresidential historic resources for credits in excess of $2,000,000.00, not less than $2,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall must be approved for small nonresidential historic resources. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of large nonresidential historic resources for credits in excess of $2,000,000.00, not less than $2,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall must be approved for large nonresidential historic resources. To the extent the office receives applications for the rehabilitation of residential historic resources for credits in excess of $1,000,000.00, not less than $1,000,000.00 of the $5,000,000.00 each calendar year shall be approved for residential historic resources. The office shall not issue a preapproval letter or certificate of completed rehabilitation that authorizes a qualified taxpayer to claim a credit of more than $2,000,000.00 in a single tax year for the same historic resource. If, for any calendar year, the office issues preapproval letters and reserves the maximum amount of tax credits allowed under this section for that calendar year, the office shall notify all applicants who have submitted completed applications and rehabilitation plans then awaiting approval or submitted for approval after the calculation is made that no additional preapproval letters for rehabilitation plans will be issued during that calendar year. The office shall also notify those applicants of the priority number given to the owner's application and rehabilitation plan awaiting approval. The applications and plans will remain in priority status for 2 years from the date of the original application and plan and will be considered for approval and reservation of tax credits in the priority order established in this subsection in the event that additional credits become available resulting from the rescission of approvals under this subsection or subsection (5) and at the beginning of the next calendar year. An applicant that has received a preapproval letter shall commence rehabilitation, if it has not previously begun, within 1 year after the issuance of the preapproval letter and complete the rehabilitation plan within 8 years after the issuance of the preapproval letter or the office will rescind the preapproval letter and reallocate the amount of the credit reserved for that rehabilitation plan. Upon On completion of a rehabilitation plan for which a preapproval letter was issued, the applicant shall submit to the office documentation that the rehabilitation is complete and the completed rehabilitation of the historic resource meets the criteria under subsection (6) and either of the following: (a) All of the following criteria: (i) The historic resource contributes to the significance of the historic district in which it is located or is individually listed on the National Register of Historic Places or state register of historic sites. (ii) Both the rehabilitation plan and completed rehabilitation of the historic resource meet the federal Secretary of the Interior's standards for rehabilitation and guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings, under 36 CFR part 67 and related guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings. (iii) All rehabilitation work has been done to or within the walls, boundaries, or structures of the historic resource or to historic resources located within the property boundaries of the property. (b) The applicant has received certification from the National Park Service that the historic resource's significance, the rehabilitation plan, and the completed rehabilitation qualify for the credit allowed under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code. (4) The office shall verify that the rehabilitation is complete and meets the criteria under subsection (3). However, if the applicant is eligible for the credit allowed under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, additional documentation that the rehabilitation is complete for the credit allowed under this section is not required. Within 120 days after receiving verification, in a form and manner as prescribed by the office, that the rehabilitation is complete and meets the requirements of subsection (3), the office shall issue a certificate of completed rehabilitation to the applicant that states the rehabilitation plan submitted by the applicant has been completed, the amount of qualified expenditures, and the total amount of the credit allowed to be claimed by a qualified taxpayer under this section. If the amount of qualified expenditures incurred exceeds the amount of the tax credits reserved by the preapproval letter issued under subsection (3), the applicant may submit a request to the office, in a form and manner as prescribed by the office, for the issuance and approval of a certificate of completed rehabilitation in excess of the amount initially authorized in the preapproval letter. If the office determines that less than $5,000,000.00 has been reserved under preapproval letters issued for the calendar year, after priority has been given to those notified under subsection (3), then the office may issue a certificate of completed rehabilitation in excess of the amount included in the preapproval letter. (5) The office may inspect a historic resource at any time during the rehabilitation process and may revoke the preapproval letter or the certificate of completed rehabilitation if the rehabilitation was not undertaken as represented in the rehabilitation plan or if unapproved alterations to the completed rehabilitation are made within 5 years after the tax year in which the certificate of completed rehabilitation was issued. The office shall promptly notify the department of a revocation. (6) Qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of a historic resource may be used to calculate the credit under this section if the historic resource is 1 of the following during the tax year in which a credit under this section is claimed for those qualified expenditures: (a) Individually listed on the National Register of Historic Places or state register of historic sites. (b) A contributing resource located within a historic district listed on the National Register of Historic Places or the state register of historic sites. (c) A contributing resource located within a historic district designated by a local unit pursuant to an ordinance adopted under the local historic districts act, 1970 PA 169, MCL 399.201 to 399.215. (7) A person that has been issued a certificate of completed rehabilitation under subsection (4) may assign all or any portion of the credit allowed under this section. A credit assignment under this subsection is irrevocable and shall must be made in the tax year in which a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. A qualified taxpayer may claim a portion of a credit and assign the remaining amount. If the qualified taxpayer both claims and assigns portions of the credit, the qualified taxpayer shall claim the portion it claims in the tax year in which a certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued pursuant to this section. Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, an assignee may subsequently assign the credit or any portion of the credit assigned under this subsection to 1 or more assignees. An assignment or subsequent reassignment of a credit shall must be made in the year the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. A credit assignment or subsequent reassignment under this section shall be made on a form prescribed by the office. The office shall review and issue a completed assignment or reassignment certificate to the assignee or reassignee. If the qualified taxpayer assigns all or any portion of the credit allowed under this section to a partnership, limited liability company, or subchapter S corporation, then the assignees are its partners, members, or shareholders based on the partner's, member's, or shareholder's proportionate share of ownership or on an alternative method approved by the office. A credit amount assigned under this subsection may be claimed against the assignee's tax liability under this part or part 1. An assignee or subsequent reassignee shall attach a copy of the completed assignment certificate to the annual return required to be filed under this part for the tax year in which the assignment or reassignment is made and the assignee or reassignee first claims the credit, which shall must be the same tax year. (8) If the credit allowed under this section for the tax year and any unused carryforward of the credit allowed by this section exceed the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year shall must not be refunded but may be carried forward to offset tax liability in subsequent tax years for 10 years or until used up, whichever occurs first. If a qualified taxpayer has an unused carryforward of a credit under this section, the amount otherwise added under subsection (9) to the qualified taxpayer's tax liability may instead be used to reduce the qualified taxpayer's carryforward under this section. (9) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (10), if a certificate of completed rehabilitation is revoked under subsection (5) or a historic resource is sold or disposed of less than 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, the following percentage of the credit amount previously claimed relative to that historic resource shall must be added back to the tax liability of the qualified taxpayer that received the certificate of completed rehabilitation and not the assignee in the year of the revocation: (a) If the revocation is less than 1 year after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 100%. (b) If the revocation is at least 1 year but less than 2 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 80%. (c) If the revocation is at least 2 years but less than 3 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 60%. (d) If the revocation is at least 3 years but less than 4 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 40%. (e) If the revocation is at least 4 years but less than 5 years after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, 20%. (f) If the revocation is at least 5 years or more after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued, an addback to the qualified taxpayer tax liability is not required. (10) Subsection (9) shall does not apply if the qualified taxpayer enters into a written agreement with the office that will allow for the transfer or sale of the historic resource and provides the following: (a) Reasonable assurance that subsequent to after the transfer the property will remain a historic resource during the 5-year period after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. (b) A method that the department can recover an amount from the qualified taxpayer equal to the appropriate percentage of credit added back as described under subsection (9). (c) An encumbrance on the title to the historic resource being sold or transferred, stating that the property must remain a historic resource throughout the 5-year period after the certificate of completed rehabilitation is issued. (d) A provision for the payment by the qualified taxpayer of all legal and professional fees associated with the drafting, review, and recording of the written agreement required under this subsection. (11) The office may impose a fee to cover the administrative cost of implementing the program under this section. (12) The qualified taxpayer shall attach all of the following to the qualified taxpayer's annual return required under this part, if applicable, on which the credit is claimed: (a) Certificate of completed rehabilitation. (b) Certification of historic significance related to the historic resource and the qualified expenditures used to claim a credit under this section. (c) A completed assignment form if the qualified taxpayer or assignee has assigned any portion of a credit allowed under this section or if the qualified taxpayer is an assignee of any portion of a credit allowed under this section. (13) The office may promulgate rules to implement this section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (14) The total of the credits claimed under this section and section 266a for a rehabilitation project shall must not exceed 25% of the total qualified expenditures eligible for the credit under this section for that rehabilitation project. (15) The office shall submit an economic impact report that includes, to the extent available, all of the following to the legislature annually for the immediately preceding state fiscal year: (a) The fee schedule used by the office and the total amount of fees collected. (b) A description of each rehabilitation project for which a preapproval letter is issued and for each certificate of completed rehabilitation issued. The description must include the total rehabilitation costs, labor hours generated, jobs added, payroll added, total capital investments, gain in property value after rehabilitation, and the amount of income tax and sales tax generated by the rehabilitation project. (c) The location of each new and ongoing rehabilitation project. (16) As used in this section: (a) "Contributing resource" means a historic resource that contributes to the significance of the historic district in which it is located. (b) "Detroit Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. (c) "Historic district" means an area, or group of areas not necessarily having contiguous boundaries, that contains 1 resource or a group of resources that are related by history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, or culture. (d) "Historic resource" means a publicly or privately owned historic building, structure, site, object, feature, or open space located within a historic district designated by the National Register of Historic Places, the state register of historic sites, or a local unit acting under the local historic districts act, 1970 PA 169, MCL 399.201 to 399.215; or that is individually listed on the state register of historic sites or National Register of Historic Places. (e) "Large nonresidential historic resource" means a nonowner-occupied, income producing historic resource that has a rehabilitation plan with qualified expenditures of $2,000,000.00 or more. (f) "Local unit" means a county, city, village, or township. (g) "Long-term lease" means a lease term of at least 27.5 years for a residential resource or at least 31.5 years for a nonresidential resource. (h) "Open space" means undeveloped land, a naturally landscaped area, or a formal or man-made landscaped area that provides a connective link or a buffer between other resources. (i) "Qualified expenditures" means capital expenditures that qualify, or would qualify except that the qualified taxpayer entered into an agreement under subsection (10), for a rehabilitation credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code if the qualified taxpayer is eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code or, if the applicant is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code, the qualified expenditures that would qualify under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code except that the expenditures are made to a historic resource that is not eligible for the credit under section 47(a)(2) of the internal revenue code that were paid. Qualified expenditures do not include capital expenditures for nonhistoric additions to a historic resource except an addition that is required by state or federal regulations that relate to historic preservation, safety, or accessibility. (j) "Qualified taxpayer" means a person that is an assignee under this section or section 266a or that either owns the resource to be rehabilitated or has a long-term lease agreement with the owner of the historic resource and that has qualified expenditures for the rehabilitation of the historic resource that satisfies either of the following: (i) For the rehabilitation of a historic resource that is not a residential historic resource, qualified expenditures equal to or greater than 10% of the state equalized valuation of the property. If the historic resource to be rehabilitated is a portion of a historic or nonhistoric resource, the state equalized valuation of only that portion of the property shall must be used for purposes of this subdivision. If the assessor for the local tax collecting unit in which the historic resource is located determines the state equalized valuation of that portion, that assessor's determination shall must be used for purposes of this subdivision. If the assessor does not determine that state equalized valuation of that portion, qualified expenditures, for purposes of this subdivision, shall must be equal to or greater than 5% of the appraised value as determined by a certified appraiser. If the historic resource to be rehabilitated does not have a state equalized valuation, qualified expenditures for purposes of this subdivision shall must be equal to or greater than 5% of the appraised value of the resource as determined by a certified appraiser. (ii) For the rehabilitation of a residential historic resource, qualified expenditures equal to or greater than $1,000.00. The dollar amount established under this subparagraph must be annually adjusted for inflation using the Detroit Consumer Price Index. (k) "Rehabilitation plan" means a plan for the rehabilitation of a historic resource that meets the federal Secretary of the Interior's standards for rehabilitation and guidelines for rehabilitation of historic buildings under 36 CFR part 67 and related guidelines for rehabilitating historic buildings. (l) "Residential historic resource" means a non-income producing historic resource that is an owner-occupied dwelling. (m) "Small nonresidential historic resource" means a nonowner-occupied, income producing historic resource that has a rehabilitation plan with qualified expenditures of less than $2,000,000.00. (n) "State historic preservation office" or "office" means the state historic preservation office created by Executive Order No. 2007-53 and transferred to the Michigan strategic fund by Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-3, MCL 125.1998.bureau of fair competition and free enterprise by section 13 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Sec. 680. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) for a certificated credit under section 435 or 437 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1435 and 208.1437, or in subsection (5) for a certificated credit under section 431 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1431, a taxpayer that has been approved to receive, has received, or has been assigned a certificated credit that has not been fully claimed or paid prior to January 1, 2012 may, for the taxpayer's first tax year ending after December 31, 2011 only, elect to file a return and pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, in lieu of the tax imposed by this part. An election under this subsection shall continue continues for the period prescribed in section 500(1) of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1500. (2) A taxpayer with a certificated credit under section 435 or 437 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1435 and 208.1437, which certificated credit may be claimed in a tax year ending after December 31, 2011 may elect to pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, in the tax year in which that certificated credit or any unused carryforward may be claimed in lieu of the tax imposed by this part. (3) A taxpayer that is a member of a unitary business group and that has a certificated credit under sections 431 and 434(2) and (5) of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1431 and 208.1434, is not required to file a combined return as a unitary business group and may elect to file a separate return and pay the tax, if any, under the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601.208.1519. (4) A taxpayer that elects to pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, under this section is not required to file an annual return under this part. (5) A taxpayer that acquires, pursuant to the modification of an existing written agreement approved by a resolution of the Michigan strategic fund board on November 27, 2018 and the subsequent transfer of that written agreement, a certificated credit authorized by the Michigan economic growth authority in 2004 under section 431 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1431, may, for the first tax year ending after October 1, 2018 only, elect to file the return and pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, in lieu of the tax imposed by this part as long as if the Michigan economic growth authority or its successor determines that the modification and subsequent transfer of that credit reduces the total amount of the credit. However, if the first tax year ending after October 1, 2018 ends before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection October 10, 2019, and the taxpayer has already filed a return for that tax year under this part, then the taxpayer may, if within the statute of limitations period prescribed under section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a, elect under this subsection to file the return and pay the tax imposed by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601, 208.1519, for that tax year by filing the necessary amended return under this part and filing an original return as provided under section 505 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1505. An election under this subsection shall continue continues for the period prescribed in section 500 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1500. (6) As used in this section: , "certificated (a) "Certificated credit" means that term as defined in section 107 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1107. (b) "Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (i) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the Michigan strategic fund created under former 1984 PA 270. (ii) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Sec. 696. (1) The revitalization and placemaking fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the revitalization and placemaking fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the revitalization and placemaking fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the revitalization and placemaking fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (2) Money in the revitalization and placemaking fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. (3) The Michigan strategic fund shall be is the administrator of the revitalization and placemaking fund for auditing purposes. (4) Beginning with the 2022-2023 state fiscal year ending September 30, 2023 and each state fiscal year thereafter, the Michigan strategic fund shall expend money from the revitalization and placemaking fund, upon on appropriation, only to create and operate the revitalization and placemaking grants program to invest in projects that enable population and tax revenue growth through rehabilitation of vacant and blighted buildings and historic structures, rehabilitation and development of vacant properties, and development of permanent place-based infrastructure associated with social zones and traditional downtowns, outdoor dining, and place-based public spaces. If grant funds are used to support residential projects, those projects must comply with other program guidelines and eligibility as determined by the Michigan strategic fund. (5) By December 31 annually, the Michigan strategic fund shall prepare and submit to the senate and house appropriations committees a report detailing the amount of revenue received by and expenditures from the revitalization and placemaking fund during the prior state fiscal year and the revitalization and placemaking fund balance at the end of the prior state fiscal year. (6) As used in this section, "Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (a) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the Michigan strategic fund created under former 1984 PA 270. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Sec. 701. As used in this chapter: (a) "Casino" means that term as defined in section 110. (b) "Casino licensee" means a person licensed to operate a casino under the Michigan Gaming Control and Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (c) "Eligible production company" means that term as defined under former section 455 of the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36. , MCL 208.1455. (d) "Flow-through entity" means an entity that for the applicable tax year is treated as an S corporation under section 1362(a) of the internal revenue code, a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited liability partnership, or a limited liability company, that for the applicable tax year is not taxed as a corporation for federal income tax purposes. Flow-through entity does not include any entity disregarded or treated as a corporation under section 699. (e) "Member" means a shareholder of an S corporation, a partner in a general partnership, a limited partnership, or a limited liability partnership, a member of a limited liability company, or a beneficiary of a trust, that is a flow-through entity. (f) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident of or domiciled in this state, a business entity that does not have its commercial domicile in this state, or a trust not organized in this state. (g) "Partnership" means a taxpayer that is required to or has elected to file as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. (h) "Publicly traded partnership" means that term as defined under section 7704 of the internal revenue code. (i) "Race meeting licensee" and "track licensee" mean a person to whom a race meeting license or track license is issued pursuant to under section 8 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.308. (j) "S corporation" means a corporation electing taxation under sections 1361 to 1379 of the internal revenue code. Sec. 711. (1) Every person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes for a tax year on income other than distributive share of income from a flow-through entity shall furnish to the person who received the income a statement in duplicate on or before January 31 of the succeeding year of the total income paid during the tax year and the amount deducted or withheld. However, if employment is terminated before the close of a calendar year by a person that goes out of business or permanently ceases to exist, then the statement required by this subsection shall must be issued within 30 days after the last compensation, winnings, or payoff of a winning ticket is paid. A duplicate of a statement made pursuant to this section and an annual reconciliation return, MI-W3, shall must be filed with the department by February 28 of the succeeding year for tax years before the 2018 tax year and by January 31 of the succeeding year for the 2018 tax year and each tax year after 2018 except that a person that goes out of business or permanently ceases to exist shall file the statement and the annual reconciliation return within 30 days after going out of business or permanently ceasing to exist. For tax years that begin before July 1, 2016, a flow-through entity that was required to withhold taxes on distributive shares of business income shall file an annual reconciliation return with the department no later than the last day of the second month following the end of the flow-through entity's federal tax year. The department may require a flow-through entity to file an annual business income information return with the department on the due date, including extensions, of its annual federal information return. (2) Every person required by this part to deduct or withhold taxes shall make a return or report in form and content and at times as prescribed by the department. An employer that has more than 250 employees shall file its annual return or report required under this section in electronic form. An employer that has entered into an agreement with a community college pursuant to under chapter 13 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.161 to 389.166, and is required to deduct or withhold taxes from compensation and make payments to a community college pursuant to under the agreement for a portion of those taxes withheld shall, for as long as the agreement remains in effect, delineate in the return or report required under this subsection between the amount deducted or withheld and paid to the this state and that amount paid to a community college. An employer that has entered into a written agreement pursuant to the good jobs for Michigan program created under section 90h of the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270 , MCL 125.2090h, shall, for as long as the written agreement remains in effect, delineate in the return or report required under this subsection the portion of those taxes withheld and paid to the state that are attributable to certified new jobs. (3) Every person who receives income subject to withholding under this part shall furnish to the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes information required to make an accurate withholding. A person who receives income subject to withholding under this part shall file with the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes revised information within 10 days after a decrease in the number of exemptions or a change in status from a nonresident to a resident. The person who receives income subject to withholding under this part may file revised information when the number of exemptions increases or when a change in status occurs from that of a resident of this state to a nonresident of this state. Revised information shall not be is not given retroactive effect for withholding purposes. A person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes shall rely on this information for withholding purposes unless directed by the department to withhold on some other basis. If a person who receives income subject to withholding under this part fails or refuses to furnish information, the person required by this part to deduct and withhold taxes shall withhold at the full rate of tax from the person's income subject to withholding under this part. Sec. 713. By July 1 of each year, based on the information received from each community college district pursuant to section 163 of the community college act of 1966, 1966 PA 331, MCL 389.163, the department shall submit to the governor, the clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the chairperson of each standing committee that has jurisdiction over economic development issues, the chairperson of each legislative budget subcommittee that has jurisdiction over economic development issues, and the president of the Michigan strategic fund director of the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act an annual report concerning the operation and effectiveness of the new jobs training programs and the corresponding withholding requirements under this chapter. The report shall must include all of the following: (a) The number of community colleges participating in the new jobs training program and the names of those colleges. (b) The number of employers that have entered into agreements with community colleges pursuant to the new jobs training program and the names of those employers organized by major industry group under the standard industrial classification code as compiled by the United States department of labor. (c) The total amount of money from a new jobs credit from withholding each employer described in subdivision (b) has remitted to the community college district. (d) The total amount of new jobs training revenue bonds each community college district has authorized, issued, or sold. (e) The total amount of each community college district's debt related to agreements at the end of the calendar year. (f) The number of degrees or certificates awarded to program participants in the calendar year. (g) The number of individuals who entered a program at each community college district in the calendar year; who completed the program in the calendar year; and who were enrolled in a program at the end of the calendar year. (h) The number of individuals who completed a program and were hired by an employer described in subdivision (b) to fill new jobs. Sec. 718. (1) By July 1 of each year, the department, in cooperation with the board of directors of the Michigan strategic fund, bureau, shall submit to each member of the legislature, the governor, the clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the senate and house fiscal agencies an annual report concerning the operation and effectiveness of the research and development tax credits created under sections 677 and 717. The report shall must include all of the following: (a) A brief assessment of the overall effectiveness of the research and development tax credits created under sections 677 and 717. The department may use the applicable provisions of the economic development incentive evaluation prepared under the economic development incentive evaluation act, 2018 PA 540, MCL 18.1751 to 18.1759, to satisfy this subdivision. (b) The number of authorized businesses filing tentative claims for a research and development tax credit for the immediately preceding calendar year. (c) The name of each authorized business submitting claims for a research and development credit with an annual return and the amount of the research and development tax credit allowed for the immediately preceding calendar year. (d) The name of each authorized business claiming an additional credit for collaboration with a research university in this state and the amount of that additional credit for the immediately preceding calendar year. (2) The board of directors of the Michigan strategic fund may delegate any actions under this chapter to authorized employees, officers, and agents of the fund, which may include employees of the MEDC. (2) (3) As used in this section, : (a) "MEDC" means that term as defined in section 4 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2004. (b) "Michigan strategic fund" means the Michigan strategic fund created under section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005."bureau" means the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.